Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.060

Members' accounts—Investment—Election.

(1) Members may select investments as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section. If a member of the public employees' retirement system entering plan 3 under RCW 41.40.785, a member of the teachers' retirement system entering plan 3 under RCW 41.32.835, or a member of the school employees' retirement system entering plan 3 under RCW 41.35.610 does not select investments, the member's account shall be invested in the default investment option of the retirement strategy fund that is closest to the retirement target date of the member. Retirement strategy fund means one of several diversified asset allocation portfolios managed by investment advisors under contract to the state investment board. The asset mix of the portfolios adjusts over time depending on a target retirement date. The retirement strategy fund asset mix may include investment in state investment board commingled funds as authorized in RCW 43.33A.170.

(2) Members may elect to have their account invested by the state investment board. In order to reduce transaction costs and address liquidity issues, based upon recommendations of the state investment board, the department may require members to provide up to ninety days' notice prior to moving funds from the state investment board portfolio to self-directed investment options provided under subsection (4) of this section.

(a) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.32 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(2).

(b) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.35 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(4).

(c) For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.40 RCW of plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(3).

(3) The state investment board shall declare unit values no less than monthly for the portfolios or funds, or portions thereof, utilized under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section. The declared values shall be an approximation of portfolio or fund values, based on internal procedures of the state investment board. Such declared unit values and internal procedures shall be in the sole discretion of the state investment board. The state investment board may delegate any of the powers and duties under this subsection, including discretion, pursuant to RCW 43.33A.030. Member accounts shall be credited by the department with a rate of return based on changes to such unit values.

(4) Members may elect to self-direct their investments as set forth in RCW 41.34.130 and 43.33A.190.

[ 2020 c 160 s 2; 2011 c 80 s 2; 2001 c 180 s 2; 2000 c 247 s 404; 1999 c 265 s 1; 1998 c 341 s 303; 1996 c 39 s 15; 1995 c 239 s 206.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2020 c 160: "The legislature finds that participants in the retirement strategy funds of the deferred compensation and plan 3 defined contribution plans would gain broader investment exposure to a diversified asset mix by including the state investment board's commingled pension fund in the asset mix. It is the intent of the legislature to confirm participant access to a broader scope of assets." [ 2020 c 160 s 1.]

Effective date—2001 c 180 ss 1 and 2: See note following RCW 41.45.061.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1998 c 341: "Sections 303, 306 through 309, 404, 505, 507, 515, 701, 707, and 710 through 713 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [April 3, 1998]." [ 1998 c 341 s 716.]

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.